North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 1. Conversion to Corporation.

§ 55-11A-01.
Conversion.

A business entity, other than a domestic corporation, may convert to a domestic corporation if:

The conversion is permitted by the laws of the state or country governing the organization and internal affairs of the converting business entity; and

The converting business entity complies with the requirements of this Part and, to the extent applicable, the laws referred to in subdivision (1) of this section.

History.

2001-387, s. 17.

§ 55-11A-02.
Plan of conversion.

The converting business entity shall approve a written plan of conversion containing:

The name of the converting business entity, its type of business entity, and the state or country whose laws govern its organization and internal affairs;

The name of the resulting domestic corporation into which the converting business entity shall convert;

The terms and conditions of the conversion; and

The manner and basis for converting the interests in the converting business entity into shares, obligations, or other securities of the resulting domestic corporation or into cash or other property in whole or in part.

(a1)

The plan of conversion may contain other provisions relating to the conversion.

(a2)

The provisions of the plan of conversion, other than the provisions required by subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this section, may be made dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan of conversion if the plan of conversion sets forth the manner in which the facts will operate upon the affected provisions. The facts may include any of the following:

(1)

Statistical or market indices, market prices of any security or group of securities, interest rates, currency exchange rates, or similar economic or financial data.

(2)

A determination or action by the converting business entity or by any other person, group, or body.

(3)

The terms of, or actions taken under, an agreement to which the converting business entity is a party, or any other agreement or document.

The plan of conversion shall be approved in accordance with the laws of the state or country governing the organization and internal affairs of the converting business entity.

After a plan of conversion has been approved as provided in subsection (b) of this section, but before articles of incorporation for the resulting domestic corporation become effective, the plan of conversion may be amended or abandoned to the extent permitted by the laws that govern the organization and internal affairs of the converting business entity.

History.

2001-387, s. 17; 2005-268, s. 29.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-268, s. 29, effective October 1, 2005, added the subsection (a1) designation; and added subsection (a2).

§ 55-11A-03.
Filing of articles of incorporation by converting entity.

After a plan of conversion has been approved by the converting business entity as provided in G.S. 55-11A-02, the converting business entity shall deliver articles of incorporation to the Secretary of State for filing. In addition to the matters required or permitted by

G.S. 55-2-02

, the articles of incorporation shall contain articles of conversion stating:

That the corporation is being formed pursuant to a conversion of a business entity;

The name of the converting business entity, its type of business entity, and the state or country whose laws govern its organization and internal affairs; and

That a plan of conversion has been approved by the converting business entity as required by law.

If the plan of conversion is abandoned after the articles of incorporation have been filed with the Secretary of State but before the articles of incorporation become effective, the converting business entity shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing prior to the time the articles of incorporation become effective an amendment to the articles of incorporation withdrawing the articles of incorporation.

The conversion takes effect when the articles of incorporation become effective.

Certificates of conversion shall also be registered as provided in

G.S. 47-18.1

.

History.

2001-387, s. 17.

§ 55-11A-04.
Effects of conversion.

When the conversion takes effect:

The converting business entity ceases its prior form of organization and continues in existence as the resulting domestic corporation;

The title to all real estate and other property owned by the converting business entity continues vested in the resulting domestic corporation without reversion or impairment;

All liabilities of the converting business entity continue as liabilities of the resulting domestic corporation;

A proceeding pending by or against the converting business entity may be continued as if the conversion did not occur; and

The interests in the converting business entity that are to be converted into shares, obligations, or other securities of the resulting domestic corporation or into the right to receive cash or other property are thereupon so converted, and the former holders of interests in the converting business entity are entitled only to the rights provided in the plan of conversion.The conversion shall not affect the liability or absence of liability of any holder of an interest in the converting business entity for any acts, omissions, or obligations of the converting business entity made or incurred prior to the effectiveness of the conversion. The cessation of the existence of the converting business entity in its prior form of organization in the conversion shall not constitute a dissolution or termination of the converting business entity.

History.

2001-387, s. 17.

§§ 55-11A-05 through 55-11A-09.

Reserved for future codification purposes.